Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 2 School Committees and Superintendents [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-2-9.5.
Other post-employment benefits — OPEB trusts.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law, or the provisions of any municipality’s home rule charter, to the contrary, for purposes of funding any unfunded liability for other post-employment benefits including, but not limited to, health care and dental care benefits hereinafter referred to as (“OPEB”) in accordance with government accounting standards board statements 43 and 45, a school district, acting by its business manager or superintendent, upon an approving resolution of the school committee or school board as applicable, may enter into a trust agreement between the school district and a corporate trustee which shall be a bank or trust company doing business in the state, or a corporation established pursuant to chapter 5 of title 45. This trust agreement shall be in any form deemed proper by the business manager or superintendent, and shall be executed by its business manager or superintendent and countersigned by the chair of the school committee of the school district. It shall be lawful for any bank, trust company, or entity organized pursuant to §

45-5-20.1

doing business in the state to act as a depository or trustee under this trust agreement, and to furnish indemnification and pledge securities that may be required by any school district.

OPEB trust funds shall be credited with all amounts appropriated or otherwise made available by the school district for the purposes of meeting the current and future OPEB costs payable by the school district. OPEB trust funds shall also be credited with all amounts contributed or otherwise made available by employees of the school district for the purpose of meeting future OPEB costs payable by the school district. Amounts in an OPEB trust fund, including any earnings or interest accruing from the investment of these amounts, shall be expended only for the payment of the costs payable by the school district for OPEB or as otherwise permitted by the terms of the trust and applicable law. The business manager or superintendent, as applicable, shall invest or reinvest the amounts in the OPEB trust fund in any investment permitted for the state pension funds consistent with the investment policies of the state general treasurer’s office.

School districts are hereby authorized to enter into agreements, trusts, contracts, and other arrangements with the state and any of its departments, agencies, boards or commissions relating to the execution, management or operation of the OPEB trust funds, including, but not limited to, investments, and the state and its department, agencies, boards and commissions are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, contracts and other arrangements with school districts. Notwithstanding any provisions of any general or special law or principle of equity to the contrary, the state shall have no liability to any school district for entering into such agreements.

A school district may employ any qualified bank, trust company, corporation, firm or person to advise it on the investment of the OPEB trust fund and may pay from the OPEB trust fund for this advice and other services. Procurement for these services shall be subject to the procurement procedures and rules governing school districts and municipalities in the state.

School districts are also hereby authorized to enter into agreements, trusts, contracts, and other arrangements with any corporation created pursuant to chapter 5 of title 45 relating to the execution, management or operation of the OPEB trust funds, including, but not limited to, investments, and the corporations established pursuant to §

45-5-20.1

are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements, contracts and other arrangements with school districts.

Nothing contained herein will prevent any school district from entering into agreements with other school districts per §

16-2-9.2

for the purposes of jointly pooling their investments or collectively entering into an agreement with a corporate trustee, as defined in subsection (a) of this section.

Nothing herein shall be construed to exempt OPEB trusts from the Rhode Island Access to Public Records Act, §

38-2-1

et seq.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 92, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 134, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 443, § 1.

16-2-9.6.
Joint purchasing agreements for technology and IT infrastructure.

Notwithstanding any other law or rule, any two (2) or more school committees may establish joint purchasing agreements between and among themselves or with the Rhode Island Society of Technology Educators (“RISTE”), a domestic, nonprofit corporation, for the purposes of establishing bids pursuant to chapter 55 of title 45, and jointly purchasing technology-related goods and services. The RISTE, acting on behalf of any school committee(s) that are members of a joint purchasing agreement with RISTE, may establish specifications and bid on behalf of the member school districts. The RISTE shall comply with bidding requirements of chapter 55 of title 45. The RISTE and any consortia created pursuant to a joint purchase agreement under this chapter shall be entitled to all the rights and benefits set forth in §

37-2-56

. Notwithstanding the foregoing, nothing in this section permits any non-public school or non-public school district access to the master price agreement maintained by the department of administration, division of purchases.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 193, § 1.

16-2-10.
Certification of superintendents.

No person shall be employed as superintendent of schools in any city or town unless the person holds a certificate of qualification issued by or under the authority of the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1560, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 9; P.L. 1925, ch. 598, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-10

; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 71.

16-2-11.
General powers and duties of superintendent.

The superintendent of schools employed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter shall, under the direction of the school committee, have the care and supervision of the public schools and shall be the chief administrative agent of the school committee. The superintendent shall have any duties as are defined in this section and in this title and any other duties as may be determined by the school committee, and shall perform any other duties as may be vested in him or her by law. In addition to the care and supervision of public schools and the appointment of employees of the district, it shall be the duty of the superintendent:

To implement policies established by the school committee.

To recommend educational plans, policies, and programs to meet the needs of the district.

To recommend policies governing curriculum, courses of instruction, textbooks, and transportation of students.

To comply with provisions of federal and state law and local charter provisions and ordinances.

To have administrative responsibility for the school system.

To appoint principals for each public school within the district at levels of compensation determined in accordance with policies established by the school committee.

To appoint administrators and other personnel not assigned to individual schools. Also, to appoint, at the recommendation of the principal, personnel at individual schools in accordance with policies established by school district policies and collective bargaining agreements.

To oversee the personnel function of the school department consistent with personnel standards, policies, and the table of organization established by the school committee.

To provide for the evaluation of department personnel appointed by the superintendent.

To prepare a school budget for consideration by the school committee.

To authorize purchases consistent with the adopted school budget, policies and directives of the school committee, and applicable municipal policies, ordinances, and charter provisions.

To be responsible for keeping the records of the school system.

To report to the school committee on a regular basis the financial condition of the school system.

To oversee discipline in the school system.

To evaluate all schools within the school system and to report to the school committee the conformity with regulations of the council on elementary and secondary education and the policies, programs, and directives of the school committee.

To report to the school committee on the operation of the school system, including an annual report on the district’s progress.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to collectively bargain pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28, or to allow any school superintendent to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

If at any time during the fiscal year the superintendent of schools determines, or is notified by the city or town chief charter officer or treasurer, that the estimated school expenses may exceed all revenue appropriated by the state or city or town or otherwise for public schools in the city or town, the superintendent of schools shall recommend to the school committee and shall, in order to provide for continuous regular public school operations consistent with the requirements of §

16-2-2

without regard to financial conditions, subsequently report to the city or town treasurer and chief charter officer what action will be taken to prevent an excess of expenditures, encumbrances, and accruals over revenues for public schools in the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1918, ch. 1667, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-11

; P.L. 1980, ch. 152, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 2.

16-2-11.1.
General powers and duties of school principals.

Principals employed under this section shall be the educational administrators and managers of their schools and shall supervise the operation and management of their schools and school property, subject to the supervision and direction of the superintendent. The principal shall have any duties as are defined in this section and in this title and shall perform any other duties as may be vested in him or her by law. In addition to serving as the educational administrator and manager of his or her school, it shall be the duty of the principal:

In consultation with the school improvement team, to recommend the hiring of all teachers, athletic coaches, instructional or administrative aides, and other personnel assigned to the school, consistent with district personnel policies, collective bargaining agreements, and budgetary restrictions, and subject to the approval of the superintendent. Provided, that the hiring of employees may not interfere with the layoff or recall rights provided in collective bargaining agreements and the provisions of §

16-13-6

.

To recommend the termination of any teachers, athletic coaches, instructional or administrative aides, and other personnel assigned to the school, consistent with district personnel policies, collective bargaining agreements, and budgetary restrictions, subject to review and prior approval by the superintendent and subject to the provisions of this chapter.

To oversee the care, control, and management of school facilities and equipment.

In consultation with the school improvement team, to prepare a school budget for consideration by the superintendent.

To provide for the evaluation of personnel assigned to the school, including all teachers, consistent with the standards developed by the school committee pursuant to §

16-2-9(a)(15)

.

In cooperation with the district’s leadership, to initiate a performance review plan for the school and for individual teachers.

It shall be the responsibility of the principal, in consultation with professional staff of the building, to promote participatory decision making among all professional staff for the purpose of developing educational policy.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit or interfere with the rights of teachers and other school employees to collectively bargain pursuant to chapters 9.3 and 9.4 of title 28, or to allow any school principal to abrogate any agreement reached by collective bargaining.

Recognizing that there may be a transition period necessary to implement the provisions of this section, all local education agencies, as defined in chapter 97.1 of title 16, shall ensure that the implementation of the powers and duties of school principals as provided by this section are adopted and implemented as soon as practical, but no later than August 1, 2021.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 224, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 259, § 3.

16-2-12.
Joint superintendent employed by two or more cities or towns.

The school committee of two (2) or more cities or towns, in which the aggregate number of schools shall not be more than sixty (60), may by vote unite for the purpose of the employment of a superintendent of the schools of the several cities or towns.

History of Section.

P.L. 1903, ch. 1101, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 6; P.L. 1912, ch. 804, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-12

.

16-2-13.
Joint committee — Annual convention — Superintendent — Dissolution.

The school committees of the cities or towns voting to unite for the purpose of the employment of a superintendent of the schools as prescribed in §

16-2-12

, shall form a joint committee, for the purpose of this chapter; the joint committee shall be the agents of each city or town comprising the union. The school committees shall meet annually in joint convention at a place and time agreed upon by the chairpersons of the several school committees, and shall organize by the choice of a chairperson and secretary. They shall choose by ballot a superintendent of schools, fix his or her salary, and apportion the amount to be paid by each of the cities or towns, approximately according to the next preceding school census in the city or town. The union shall not be dissolved because the number of schools shall have increased beyond the number of sixty (60), nor, for any reason, for the period of three (3) years from the date of the formation of the union, except by concurrent votes of the school committees of a majority of the cities or towns constituting the union.

History of Section.

P.L. 1903, ch. 1101, § 3; P.L. 1904, ch. 1147, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 7; P.L. 1912, ch. 804, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-13

; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 26.

16-2-14.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1903, ch. 1101, § 4; P.L. 1904, ch. 1147, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 66, § 8; P.L. 1919, ch. 1725, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-14

; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12.

16-2-15.
Location of schools — Control of property.

The school committee shall locate all schoolhouses, and shall not abandon, close, or change the location of any without good cause; and, unless provided by law, the school committee of each city or town shall have the care and control of all public school buildings and other public school property of the city or town, including repairs of the buildings and the purchase of furniture and other school equipment.

The school committee of any city or town may provide public school housing for the city or town by lease of buildings or portions of buildings, furniture, and other school equipment, subject to the following provisions:

During the period or periods to which the lease applies the property leased shall be public school property of the city or town in all respects to the same effect as any public school building of the city or town;

The lease shall provide for use and occupancy of periods at least the same as or equivalent to the periods during which public school buildings of the city or town are used and occupied;

As applied to rooms for instruction the lease shall provide for exclusive use and occupancy during the periods of the lease and may provide for common or concurrent use and occupancy of other areas of the property;

The use and occupancy under the lease may be for purpose of instruction at particular grade levels or in particular courses of study and may provide for consecutive use and occupancy of specified areas of the property provided that total use and occupancy under this lease complies with the provisions of subsection (b)(2).

Upon application of the school committee of any city or town, the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may prescribe by regulation standards for the leases in accordance with this chapter and in accordance with the Constitution, laws, and education policies and programs of the state. The expenses of the city or town under the lease shall constitute expenditures to support the basic program pursuant to the provisions of §§

16-7-15

to

16-7-34

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 60, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 3; P.L. 1917, ch. 1521, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-15

; P.L. 1969, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 286, § 1.

16-2-15.1.
Pawtucket school committee — Abandonment, closing, reopening, or acquisition of school buildings — Public hearings.

The school committee of the city of Pawtucket, whenever it shall deem it necessary to abandon or close an existing school building for a period of more than six (6) months or acquire or reopen a new school building, by either the purchase or lease of real property, shall conduct a public hearing within the city of Pawtucket for the purpose of addressing the issues of the desirability and necessity for the abandonment, closing, reopening, or acquisition, the reassignment of displaced students to other public education facilities, and the transportation of the displaced students. Any hearing shall be held on a date no more than six (6) months nor less than forty-five (45) days before the date of any abandonment, closing, reopening, or acquisition. The school committee shall give notice of the public hearing specifying the time and place of the hearing by publication of the notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the city of Pawtucket at least two (2) weeks and not more than four (4) weeks prior to the date of the hearing. At the hearing, opportunity shall be given residents of the city interested to be heard upon the proposed abandonment, closing, reopening, or acquisition and other related matters, including the reasonable opportunity to submit written or oral questions to the school committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 408, § 1.

16-2-16.
Rules and regulations — Curriculum.

The school committee shall make and cause to be put up in each schoolhouse rules and regulations for the attendance and classification of the pupils, for the introduction and use of textbooks and works of reference, and for the instruction, government, and discipline of the public schools, and shall prescribe the studies to be pursued in the schools, under the direction of the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

G.L., 1896, ch. 60, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-16

.

16-2-17.
Right to a safe school.

Each student, staff member, teacher, and administrator has a right to attend and/or work at a school which is safe and secure, and which is conducive to learning, and which is free from the threat, actual or implied, of physical harm by a disruptive student. A disruptive student is a person who is subject to compulsory school attendance, who exhibits persistent conduct which substantially impedes the ability of other students to learn, or otherwise substantially interferes with the rights stated above, and who has failed to respond to corrective and rehabilitative measures presented by staff, teachers, or administrators.

The school committee, or a school principal as designated by the school committee, may suspend all pupils found guilty of this conduct, or of violation of those school regulations which relate to the rights set forth in subsection (a), or where a student represents a threat to those rights of students, teachers, or administrators, as described in subsection (a). Nothing in this section shall relieve the school committee or school principals from following all procedures required by state and federal law regarding discipline of students with disabilities.

A student suspended under this section may appeal the action of the school committee, or a school principal as designee, to the commissioner of elementary and secondary education who, after notice to the parties interested of the time and place of hearing, shall examine and decide the appeal without cost to the parties involved. Any decision of the commissioner in these matters shall be subject to appeal by the student to the council on elementary and secondary education and any decision of the council may be appealed by the student to the family court for the county in which the school is located as provided in §

42-35-15

.

All school superintendents, or their designees, shall review annually, the discipline data for their school district, collected in accordance with the specifications set forth in §

16-60-4(a)(21)

, to determine whether the discipline imposed has a disproportionate impact on students based on race, ethnicity, or disability status and to appropriately respond to any such disparity. In addition to the data submitted, if a disparity exists, the school district shall submit a report to the council on elementary and secondary education describing the conduct of the student, the frequency of the conduct, prior disciplinary actions for the conduct, any other relevant information and corrective actions to address the disparity, after consultation with representatives of the faculty has been taken to address the disparity. The reports shall be deemed to be public records for purposes of title 38.

On or before September 1, 2023, and annually by September 1 thereafter, the Rhode Island department of education, in coordination with the Rhode Island office of the attorney general, shall, for each school district, annually collect, report, and publish on its website, data on: the number of school resource officers; the use of force against students, including, but not limited to, the number of instances force was used and the type of the force used; arrests of students and reasons for arrest; student referrals to law enforcement and reasons for referral; student referrals to court or court service units; and the number and type of any other disciplinary actions taken or recommended by school resource officers involving students. All data shall be published in a manner that protects the identities of students and shall be collected and designated by student age, grade, race, ethnicity, gender, language status, and disability, to the extent that the demographic data is available.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 60, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-17

; P.L. 1992, ch. 358, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 30, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 51, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 171, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 391, § 1, effective June 30, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 392, § 1, effective June 30, 2022.

16-2-17.1.
In school suspensions.

Suspensions issued shall not be served out of school unless the student’s conduct meets the standards set forth in §

16-2-17(a)

or the student represents a demonstrable threat to students, teachers, or administrators.

History of Section.

P.L. 2016, ch. 171, § 2; P.L. 2016, ch. 186, § 2.

16-2-18.
Selection of teachers and superintendent — General control of schools — Expenses.

The selection of superintendent, in any city or towns that do not unite for the employment of a superintendent, and the entire care, control, and management of all the public school interests of the several cities or towns, shall be vested in the school committee of the several cities or towns, and they shall also draw all orders for the payment of their expenses; provided, that these expenses shall not in any fiscal year exceed the total of all revenue appropriated by the state or city or town or otherwise for the public schools under the care, control, and management of the school committee. If, in any fiscal year a school committee is notified that estimated expenses may exceed total available appropriations, the school committee shall adopt and implement a plan to maintain a balanced school budget, which plan shall provide for continuous regular public school operations consistent with the requirements of §

16-2-2

; provided, that in no fiscal year shall a deficit be permitted for school operations. It is provided that, with the exception of the selection of the superintendent, the selection and appointment of teachers and other school department personnel shall be made by the superintendent with the consent of the school committee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1903, ch. 1101, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 22; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-18

; P.L. 1980, ch. 152, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 1.

16-2-18.1.
Criminal records review.

Any person seeking employment with a private school or public school department who has not previously been employed by a private school or public school department in Rhode Island during the past twelve (12) months shall undergo a national and state criminal background check to be initiated prior to, or within one week of, employment after receiving a conditional offer of employment; provided, however, that employees hired prior to August 1, 2001, and or who have been continuously employed by a public school department in Rhode Island during the past twelve (12) months shall be exempt from the requirements of this section and §

16-2-18.2

.

The applicant shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification (BCI), department of attorney general, state police, or local police department where they reside, for a national and state criminal records check. Fingerprinting shall be required. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information, the bureau of criminal identification, state police or local police department will inform the applicant, in writing, of the nature of the disqualifying information; and, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information, will notify the employer, in writing, that disqualifying information has been discovered.

An employee against whom disqualifying information has been found may request that a copy of the criminal background report be sent to the employer who shall make a judgment regarding the employment of the employee.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification, state police, or local police department shall inform the applicant and the employer, in writing, of this fact.

For purposes of this section:

“Disqualifying information” means those offenses listed in §§

23-17-37

,

11-37-8.1

,

11-37-8.3

,

11-9-1(b)

,

11-9-1(c)

,

11-9-1.3

; and

“Employment” means those individuals hired directly by the private school or public school department, contractual employees of the private school or public school department, and those individuals, who may have direct or unmonitored contact with children or students, who are hired by a third party who or that has contracted with the private school or public school department to provide services.

The employer shall maintain on file, subject to inspection by the department of elementary and secondary education, evidence that criminal records checks have been initiated on all employees seeking employment subsequent to July 13, 1998, and the results of the checks. The applicant shall be responsible for the costs of the national and state criminal records check.

At the conclusion of the criminal background check required in this section, the attorney general, state police, or local police department shall promptly destroy the fingerprint record of the applicant obtained pursuant to this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 286, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 227, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 413, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 452, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 408, § 1.

16-2-18.2.
Prior criminal records checks.

If an applicant for employment has undergone a national and state criminal records check within twelve (12) months prior to an application for employment, the employer may request from the bureau of criminal identification or local police department a letter indicating the presence or absence of disqualifying information. The bureau of criminal identification will respond without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information. The letter may be maintained on file to satisfy the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 286, § 1.

16-2-18.3.
Rules and regulations.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the intent of this chapter. These regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the rule-making provisions of chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 315, § 1.

16-2-18.4.
Criminal records review for volunteers.

Any person who is a current or prospective volunteer of a private school or public school department and who may have direct and unmonitored contact with children and/or students on school premises, shall undergo a state criminal background check to be initiated prior to or within one week of commencement of such volunteer work.

The applicant shall apply to the bureau of criminal identification (BCI), department of attorney general, state police or local police department where he or she resides, for a state criminal records check. Upon the discovery of any disqualifying information, the bureau of criminal identification, state police or local police department will inform the applicant in writing of the nature of the disqualifying information; and, without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information will notify the school department in writing that disqualifying information has been discovered.

A person against whom disqualifying information has been found may request that a copy of the criminal background report be sent to the school department which shall make a judgment regarding the qualifications and fitness of said person to volunteer for the school department.

In those situations in which no disqualifying information has been found, the bureau of criminal identification, state police or local police department shall inform the applicant and the school department in writing of this fact.

For purposes of this section, “disqualifying information” means those offenses listed in §

23-17-37

, and those offenses listed in §§

11-37-8.1

and

11-37-8.3

.

The school department shall maintain on file, subject to inspection by the department of elementary and secondary education, evidence that criminal records checks have been initiated on all volunteers seeking employment subsequent to July 1, 2012, and the results of the checks. The current or prospective volunteer shall be responsible for the costs of the state criminal records check.

As used in this section and §

16-2-18.5

, the term “school department” means the school department for a public school as well as the governing administrative body for a private school.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 45, § 2.

16-2-18.5.
Prior criminal records checks for school volunteers.

If a current or prospective volunteer of the school department or of a private school who may have direct and unmonitored contact with children and/or students on school premises has undergone a state criminal records check within twelve (12) months prior to commencement of volunteering for the school department, the school department may request from the bureau of criminal identification or local police department a letter indicating the presence or absence of disqualifying information. The bureau of criminal identification will respond without disclosing the nature of the disqualifying information. The letter may be maintained on file to satisfy the requirements of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 34, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 45, § 2.

16-2-19.
Children attending in adjoining cities or towns.

Whenever the school committee of any city or town shall find that it is more convenient or expedient for any child residing in the city or town to attend school in an adjoining city or town, the committee may arrange with the school authorities of the city or town for the attendance of the child at their schools, and may pay for the tuition out of the city or town appropriation for public schools. The amount paid shall be used for school purposes only.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 60, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-19

.

16-2-20.
Visitation and examination of schools.

The school committee shall make provision for visitation and inspection of every public school in the city or town by the superintendent of schools or other agent of the committee at regular periods or as often as may be required for proper supervision; provided that at least once during every school year an examination shall be made of the schoolhouse and premises, including classrooms, laboratories, and other rooms used by pupils and teachers, with particular reference to cleanliness, heating, lighting, seating, ventilation, and other sanitary arrangements, and to corridors, stairways, doors, windows, fire escapes, and other devices for the protection of life in case of fire; and of registers and other school records, of the school library, apparatus, and equipment in classrooms and laboratories, of the books, discipline, mode of teaching, and other matters that affect instruction. Report of the visitation and examination, with recommendations for the improvement of schools, shall be made to the school committee. This section shall apply to the city of Providence.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 60, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 67, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 70, § 18; P.L. 1925, ch. 599, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 879, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

16-2-20

.